Utah statutes.
78B-11-126.   Judgment on award -- Attorney fees and litigation expenses.
(1)  Upon granting an order confirming, vacating without directing a
rehearing, modifying, or correcting an award, the court shall enter a judgment
conforming to the award.  The judgment may be recorded, docketed, and enforced
as any other judgment in a civil action.
(2)  A court may allow reasonable costs of the motion and subsequent judicial
proceedings.
(3)  On application of a prevailing party to a contested judicial proceeding
under Section 78B-11-123, 78B-11-124, or 78B-11-125, the court may add
reasonable attorney fees and other reasonable expenses of litigation incurred
in a judicial proceeding after the award is made to a judgment confirming,
vacating without directing a rehearing, modifying, or correcting an award.
